src/fst/affixes/acronyms.lexc
!! # Acronym inflection
!! Acronyms are inflected using a colon, followed by the inflectional endings,
!! which depend on either last letter of the word or inflection class of the
!! last word of the abbreviation. The exception to the inflection scheme is the
!! singular nominative, which appears without colon.
!!
!! Pronouncable abbreviations such as aids, hiv, kela, alko etc. are actually
!! counted as regular words with regular inflection patterns.
!!
!! c.f. [VISK § 169](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=169)


!! ## Acronyms ending in numbers inflect like the numbers are pronounced.

LEXICON ACRO_cons
+N+ACR+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON ACRO_vow
+N+ACR+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON UNIT
# ;

LEXICON ACRO_LONDON
# ;

LEXICON ACRONOUN_vow # ;
LEXICON ACRO_ACCRA # ;
LEXICON ACRONOUN_cons # ;
LEXICON ACRO_BERN # ;
LEXICON ACRO_NYSTØ # ;
LEXICON DYN_ACRO_cons 
 +Use/Circ+Use/SpellNoSugg: # ;    

LEXICON DYN_ACRO_vow 
 +Use/Circ+Use/SpellNoSugg: # ;    
   
! old file
LEXICON ACRO_BACK_CASES

:  ACRO_BACK_PLURALS ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>han  # ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan  # ;

+Foc/han+Qst:%>han%>ko  # ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa  # ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaan%>ko  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa  # ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan  # ;

+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>ko  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa  # ;

+Qst:%>ko  # ;

+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han  # ;

+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan  # ;

+Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin  # ;

+Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa  # ;

+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s  # ;

+Foc/pa:%>pa  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin  # ;

+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT

:  # ;
:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN

+Sg+Ill:a%>a  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:a%>an  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:e%>e  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:e%>en  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN

+Sg+Ill:%>ha  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>han  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON

+Sg+Ill:%>ho  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hon  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN

+Sg+Ill:%>hu  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hun  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN

+Sg+Ill:i%>i  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:i%>in  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON

+Sg+Ill:o%>o  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:o%>on  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN

+Sg+Ill:%>see  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>seen  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A

+Sg+Par:%>a  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>a  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA

+Pl+Par:%>j%>a  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA

+Sg+Par:%>ta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>ine  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS

+Px3:%>nsa  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN

+Px3:%>an  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;
:  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN ;
:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;
:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL

:  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;
:  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

:  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;
:  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN ;
:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM

+Sg+Nom:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_BACK_SINGULARS

+Pl+Nom:%>t  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>na  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:  # ;

+Sg+Nom:%>  ACRO_BACK_POSS ;
+Sg+Nom:%>  ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

+Sg+Par:%>ta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_COMPOUND

+TruncPrefix:-  # ;

#:-  NOUN ;
#:-  ADJECTIVE ;
#:-  SUFFIX ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_CASES

:  ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>hän  # ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään  # ;

+Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö  # ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä  # ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kään  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kään%>kö  # ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä  # ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään  # ;

+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>kö  # ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä  # ;

+Qst:%>kö  # ;

+Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän  # ;

+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään  # ;

+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin  # ;

+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä  # ;

+Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s  # ;

+Foc/pa:%>pä  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin  # ;

+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö  # ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT

:  # ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:e%>e  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:e%>en  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN

+Sg+Ill:%>he  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hen  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN

+Sg+Ill:%>hi  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN

+Sg+Ill:%>hy  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hyn  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN

+Sg+Ill:%>hä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hän  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN

+Sg+Ill:%>hö  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hön  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN

+Sg+Ill:i%>i  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:i%>in  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN

+Sg+Ill:ä%>ä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:ä%>än  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN

+Sg+Ill:ö%>ö  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:ö%>ön  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>tä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ

+Pl+Par:%>j%>ä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ

+Sg+Par:%>tä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä

+Sg+Par:%>ä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS

+Px3:%>nsä  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

+Px3:%>än  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM

+Sg+Nom:  # ;


LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_SINGULARS

+Pl+Nom:%>t  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>nä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:%>  ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;
+Sg+Nom:%>  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
